Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.380

Child care—Contracts—Provision of suitable space at reduced cost authorized.

When suitable space is determined to be available, either agencies or organizations of state employees may contract with one or more providers to operate child care facilities.

Subject to the approval of the director of financial management, suitable space for child care centers may be provided to organizations of state employees without charge or at reduced charge for rent or services solely for the purpose of reducing employee child care costs.

[ 1993 c 194 s 3; 1984 c 162 s 3.]